Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Chapter 91. Vermont Telecommunications Authority
§ 8067.
Remedies of bondholders and note holders.

In the event that the Authority defaults in the payment of principal or of interest on any bonds or notes issued under this chapter after they become due, whether at maturity or upon call for redemption, and the default continues for a period of 30 days, or in the event that the Authority fails or refuses to comply with the provisions of this chapter or defaults in any agreement made with the holders of an issue of bonds or notes of the Authority, the holders of 25 percent in aggregate principal amount of the bonds or notes of such issue then outstanding, by instrument or instruments filed in the Office of the Secretary of State and proved or acknowledged in the same manner as a deed to be recorded, may appoint a trustee to represent the holders of such bonds or notes for the purposes herein provided.

Such trustee may, and upon written request of the holders of 25 percent in principal amount of such bonds or notes then outstanding shall, in his or her or its own name:

enforce all rights of the bondholders or note holders, including the right to require the Authority to carry out any agreements with the holders of such bonds or notes and to perform its duties under this chapter;

enforce all rights of the bondholders or note holders, including the right to collect and enforce the payment of amounts due to the Authority, so as to carry out any contract as to, or pledge of revenues, and to require the Authority to carry out and perform the terms of any contract with the holders of such bonds or notes or its duties under this chapter;

bring suit upon all or any part of such bonds or notes;

by action or suit, require the Authority to account as if it were the trustee of an express trust for the holders of such bonds or notes;

by action or suit, enjoin any acts or things that may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the holders of such bonds or notes;

declare all such bonds or notes due and payable, and, if all defaults shall be made good, with the consent of the holders of 25 percent of the principal amount of such bonds or notes then outstanding to annul the declaration and its consequences.

The trustee shall in addition to the foregoing have and possess all the powers necessary or appropriate for the exercise of any functions specifically set forth herein or incident to the general representation of bondholders or note holders in the enforcement and protection of their rights.

Before declaring the principal of bonds or notes due and payable, the trustee shall first give 30 days’ notice in writing to the Governor, to the Authority, and to the Attorney General of the State.

The Superior Court or courts with equity jurisdiction shall have jurisdiction of any suit, action, or proceeding by the trustee on behalf of bondholders or note holders.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007.

§ 8068.
Pledge of the State.

The State does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of the notes and bonds issued under this chapter that the State will not limit or restrict the rights hereby vested in the Authority to perform its obligations and to fulfill the terms of any agreement made with the holders of its bonds or notes or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders until the notes and bonds, together with interest thereon, and interest on any unpaid installments of interest, are fully met, paid, and discharged. The Authority is authorized to execute this pledge and agreement of the State in any agreement with the holders of the notes or bonds.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007.

§ 8069.
Sovereign immunity; credit of State not pledged.

The Authority shall have the benefit of sovereign immunity to the same extent as the State of Vermont. Members, officers, employees, and the Executive Director of the Authority shall be deemed employees of the State for purposes of 12 V.S.A. chapter 189 (tort claims against State) and 3 V.S.A. chapter 29 (claims against State employees). Notwithstanding the foregoing, obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability or obligation of the State or of any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or of any political subdivision but shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of the Authority. Each obligation issued under this chapter shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the Authority shall not be obligated to pay the same nor the interest thereon except from the revenues or assets pledged therefor and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State or of any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such obligations.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007.

§ 8070.
Notes and bonds as legal investments.

Notwithstanding any other law, the State and all public officers, governmental units, and agencies thereof, all banks, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies, insurance associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business, all credit unions, and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, monies, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or notes issued under this chapter, and the bonds or notes are authorized security for any and all public deposits.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007.

§ 8071.
Quarterly and annual reports; audit.

Annual reports. On or before the last day of January of each calendar year, the Authority shall submit a report of its activities for the preceding fiscal year to the Governor and to the General Assembly. Each report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering its operations during the year. The Authority shall cause an audit of its books and accounts to be made at least once in each year by certified public accountants; the cost shall be considered an expense of the Authority and a copy shall be filed with the State Treasurer. Audits performed by a public accountant under this section shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards, including the issuance of a report on internal control over financial reporting that shall be provided to recipients of the financial statements.

Auditor examinations. The Auditor of Accounts of the State and his or her duly authorized representatives may at any time examine the accounts and books of the Authority including its receipts, disbursements, contracts, sinking funds, investments, and any other matters relating to its financial statements.

Quarterly reports. Within 30 days of the end of each quarter, the Authority shall, in addition to any other reports required under this section, submit a report of its activities for the preceding quarter to the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Institutions which shall include the following:

a description of all Authority activities to develop or facilitate development of telecommunications infrastructure that furthers the objectives of this chapter;

financial statements of the Authority, a summary of expenditures by the Authority since inception, and a forecast of expenditures;

a summary of any financial commitments made by the Authority;

a list and summary of all contracts and agreements entered into by the Authority, and a list and summary of any rail right-of-way agreements entered into by the Authority, including any waivers of charges for comparable value to the State granted under

19 V.S.A. § 26a

;

a current business plan for the Authority, including an explanation of significant changes subsequent to the most recent previous report;

identification of the impact of its activity on existing business providers.

Summaries. The Authority shall include in the annual report required under subsection (a) of this section a summary of all the information quarterly reported to the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Institutions under subsection (c) of this section, as well as a summary of any and all instances in which service providers that have entered into contracts or binding commitments with the Authority have materially defaulted, been unable to fulfill their commitments, or have requested or been granted relief from contractual or binding commitments.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007; amended

2011, No. 53

, § 19, eff. May 27, 2011;

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. May 14, 2012.

§ 8072.
Repealed. 2011, No. 53, § 20, eff. May 27, 2011.

§ 8073.
Authorization to accept appropriated monies.

The Authority is authorized to accept and expend such monies as may be appropriated or approved from time to time by the General Assembly for effectuating its corporate purposes including the payment of the initial expenses of administration and operation and the establishment of reserves or contingency funds to be available for the payment of the principal of and the interest on any bonds, notes, or other obligations of the Authority.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007.

§ 8074.
Tax exemption.

All property of the Authority is public property devoted to an essential public and governmental function and purpose and is exempt from all taxes, franchise fees, and special assessments of whatever nature of the State or any subdivision. All bonds or notes issued by the Authority or a municipality under this chapter are issued by a body corporate and public of this State and for an essential public and governmental purpose, and those bonds and notes and the interest thereon and the income therefrom and all activities of the Authority and fees, charges, funds, revenues, incomes, and other monies of the Authority, whether or not pledged or available to pay or secure the payment of those bonds or notes, or interest thereon, are exempt from all taxation, franchise fees, or special assessments of whatever kind except for transfer, inheritance, and estate taxes. This section shall not prevent a municipality from assessing and collecting from the Authority any excavation or construction fees otherwise charged by the municipality.

The Authority is not required to make or file any reports, statements, or informational returns required of any other bodies corporate except as provided in this chapter.

Buildings and structures of the Authority exempted from property taxation under this section shall be considered “State-owned property” for the purposes of the State payment in lieu of taxes (PILOT) provisions of 32 V.S.A. chapter 123, subchapter 4.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007.

§ 8075.
Liberal construction.

Neither this chapter nor anything herein contained is or shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers that the Authority might otherwise have under any laws of this State, and this chapter is cumulative to any such powers. This chapter does and shall be construed to provide a complete, additional, and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007.

§ 8076.
Inconsistent provisions in other laws superseded.

Insofar as the provisions of sections 8064 through 8074 of this title are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, general, special, or local, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007.

§ 8077.
Repealed. 2013, No. 190 (Adj. Sess.), § 13, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 8078.
Selection of proposals to provide competitive process.

Broadband service; competitive process.

In this chapter, a premise is “served” with broadband service if it has access to mass-market broadband services meeting the minimum technical characteristics identified pursuant to section 8077 of this title. In this chapter, with respect to broadband service, “unserved area” shall mean a contiguous geographic area of the State, without regard to municipal boundaries or size of geographic area, which contains premises that can obtain basic telephone service but are not served.

The Authority shall seek to enable the development of networks and telecommunications infrastructure necessary to support provision of mass-market broadband services, in all unserved areas of the State, which meet or exceed the minimum technical characteristics identified pursuant to section 8077 of this title.

The Authority shall establish and utilize an open and competitive process to solicit proposals to eliminate unserved areas through the development of telecommunications facilities or through binding commitments from service providers to offer broadband service to all unserved areas in a given region. For the purposes of this process, the Authority may divide the State into one or more regions. The Authority shall undertake substantial efforts to complete the process of competitively soliciting proposals by June 30, 2012. The Authority shall solicit and accept broadband service expansion commitments in a manner that allows small locally based broadband providers a reasonable opportunity to contribute toward realization of the policy objectives of this chapter. In evaluating proposals, the Authority shall consider:

the proposed data transfer rates and other data transmission characteristics of services which would be available to consumers;

the price to consumers of services;

the proposed cost to consumers of any new construction, equipment installation service, or facility required to obtain service;

whether the proposal would utilize the best available technology which is economically feasible;

the ability to achieve the Authority’s objectives in the most cost-effective manner; and

the availability of service of comparable quality and speed.

The Authority may support or undertake projects that enable provision of broadband service in geographic areas currently served; provided that:

such projects are the most cost-effective method for providing broadband services in nearby unserved areas; and

before undertaking such projects, the Authority makes reasonable effort to distinguish served areas and populations from unserved areas and populations within the geographic area that the project would serve, including recognition and consideration of known or probable service extensions or upgrades.

Commercial mobile radio (cellular) service, competitive process.

The Authority shall seek to eliminate areas without access to commercial mobile radio service licensed by the Federal Communications Commission through the construction of facilities and binding commitments from commercial mobile radio service providers.

The Authority shall seek to expand access to all services that utilize the technical standards which are commonly in use for providing voice and data services through commercial mobile radio service.

The Authority shall establish and utilize an open and competitive process to solicit proposals to eliminate areas without coverage from a provider of commercial mobile radio services within the State of Vermont through the development of telecommunications facilities and through binding commitments from service providers to expand service, including all unserved areas in a given region. For the purposes of this process, the Authority may divide the State into one or more regions. The Authority shall undertake substantial efforts to complete the process of competitively soliciting proposals by June 30, 2012. In evaluating proposals, the Authority shall consider the extent to which a proposal meets coverage objectives while limiting environmental impact and providing opportunities for future development of wireless communications services.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007; amended

2011, No. 53

, § 21, eff. May 27, 2011;

2013, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. June 16, 2014.

§ 8079.
Repealed. 2013, No. 190 (Adj. Sess.), § 13, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 8080.
Agreements; telecommunications facilities.

In awarding loans or grants to entities as permitted under subdivision 8062(a)(6) of this title, the Authority shall develop terms and conditions applicable to agreements covering telecommunications infrastructure that ensure payments accrue in reasonable installments and at reasonable intervals, particularly with respect to the time period commencing after an agreement is entered into but before the telecommunications facility that is the subject of the agreement is ready for commercial use.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. April 15, 2010.